Maine, session 132, LD1454.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §552, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 289, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Term. "Term" means, for the purposes of the term of a state Senator or member of
the House of Representatives, a full term of office or any portion of a term that began before
the 3rd Wednesday in June in an odd‑numbered year served by an elected official in an
office subject to the provisions of this chapter. For the purposes of the term of the Secretary
of State, Treasurer of State, Attorney General or State Auditor, "term" means a full term of
office or any portion of a term that began before the first Wednesday in December in an
odd-numbered year served by an elected official in an office subject to the provisions of
this chapter.